Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 34. Apportionment of State Representatives
District Towns and Cities Representatives Addison-1 That portion of the town of Middlebury encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of Middlebury intersects with U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Main Street; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Main Street to the traffic circle; then along the southeastern side of the centerline of the northwestern section of the traffic circle to the beginning of College Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of College Street to the intersection of Weybridge Street; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Weybridge Street to the boundary of the town of Weybridge; then westerly along the town line of Weybridge to the boundary of the town of Cornwall; then southerly along the town line of Cornwall to the boundary of the town of Salisbury; then easterly along the town line of Salisbury to the boundary of the town of Ripton; then northerly along the town line of Ripton to the boundary of Bristol; then northerly then westerly along the town line of Bristol to the boundary of the town of New Haven; then westerly along the town line of New Haven to the point of beginning 2 Addison-2 Cornwall, Goshen, Leicester, Ripton, and Salisbury 1 Addison-3 Addison, Ferrisburgh, Panton, Vergennes, Waltham and that portion of the town of New Haven encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northeastern boundary line of New Haven intersects with the Mud Creek tributary running parallel to Lime Kiln Road; then southerly along the western side of the Mud Creek tributary running parallel to Lime Kiln Road to where the Mud Creek tributary intersects with U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to where it intersects with the New Haven River; then westerly along the northern side of the New Haven River to where it intersects with the Otter Creek; then westerly along the northern side of the Otter Creek to where it intersects with Morgan Horse Farm Road and the boundary of the town of Weybridge; then westerly along the town line of Weybridge to the boundary of the town of Waltham; then easterly then northerly along the town line of Waltham to the boundary of the town of Ferrisburgh; then easterly along the town line of Ferrisburgh to the point of beginning 2 Addison-4 Bristol, Lincoln, Monkton, and Starksboro 2 Addison-5 Bridport, Weybridge, that portion of the town of Middlebury not included in ADDISON-1, and that portion of the town of New Haven not included in Addison-3 1 Addison- Rutland Hubbardton, Orwell, Shoreham, Sudbury, and Whiting 1 Bennington-1 Readsboro, Searsburg, Stamford, Woodford, and that portion of the town of Pownal encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the town of Pownal intersects with VT Route 7; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of VT Route 7 to the intersection of Barber Pond Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Barber Pond Road to the intersection of South Stream Road; then easterly along the south side of the centerline of South Stream Road to where it intersects with the power lines after 620 South Stream Road and before 802 South Stream Road; then easterly along the southern side of the power lines to where the power lines intersect with the boundary of the town of Stamford approximately one mile north of County Road; then southerly along the town line of Stamford to the state border of Massachusetts; then easterly along the state border of Massachusetts to the state border of New York; then northerly along the state border of New York to the boundary of the town of Bennington; then easterly along the town line of Bennington to the point of beginning 1 Bennington-2 That portion of the town of Bennington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the town of Bennington intersects with VT Route 9; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of VT Route 9 to where it intersects with Roaring Branch; then easterly along the northern side of Roaring Branch to where it intersects with Park Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Park Street to the intersection of Gage Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Gage Street to the intersection of North Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of North Street to the intersection of Main Street; then northwesterly along the northern side of the centerline of Main Street to the intersection of Dewey Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Dewey Street to the intersection of Monument Avenue Extension; then southerly along the western side of Monument Avenue Extension to the intersection of Carpenter Hill Road; then briefly easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Carpenter Hill Road to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the boundary of the town of Pownal; then westerly along the town line of Pownal to the state border of New York; then northerly along the state border of New York to the boundary of the town of Shaftsbury; then easterly along the town line of Shaftsbury to the boundary of the town of Woodford; then southerly along the town line of Woodford to the point of beginning 2 Bennington-3 Glastenbury, Shaftsbury, and that portion of the town of Sunderland encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the town of Sunderland intersects with the Batten Kill River; then southwesterly along the eastern side of the Batten Kill River to where it intersects with Sunderland Hill Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Sunderland Hill Road to the intersection of Borough Road; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Borough Road to the intersection of North Road; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Road to the intersection of Shady Pines; then southwesterly along the eastern side of the centerline of Shady Pines to the intersection of Kesick Swamp Road; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Kesick Swamp Road to the intersection of North Road; then briefly southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Road to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Kansas Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Kansas Road to the boundary of the town of Arlington; then southerly along the town line of Arlington to the boundary of the town of Glastenbury; then easterly along the town line of Glastenbury to the boundary of the town of Somerset; then northerly along the town line of Somerset to the boundary of the town of Stratton; then northerly along the town line of Stratton to the boundary of the town of Winhall; then westerly along the town line of Winhall to the boundary of the town of Manchester; then westerly along the town line of Manchester to the point of beginning 1 Bennington-4 Arlington, Manchester, Sandgate, and that portion of the town of Sunderland not included in BENNINGTON-3 2 Bennington-5 That portion of the town of Bennington not included in BENNINGTON-2 and that portion of the town of Pownal not included in BENNINGTON-1 2 Bennington- Rutland Danby, Dorset, Landgrove, Mount Tabor, and Peru 1 Caledonia-1 Barnet, Ryegate, and Waterford 1 Caledonia-2 Hardwick, Stannard, and Walden 1 Caledonia-3 Lyndon, Newark, Sheffield, Sutton, and Wheelock 2 Caledonia- Essex Concord, Kirby, and St. Johnsbury 2 Caledonia- Washington Cabot, Danville, and Peacham 1 Chittenden-1 Richmond 1 Chittenden-2 That portion of the town of Williston encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the town of Williston intersects with Oak Hill Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Oak Hill Road to the intersection of Old Creamery Road; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Old Creamery Road to the intersection of VT Route 2A; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of VT Route 2A to where it intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then westerly along the northern side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then northerly along the city line of South Burlington to the boundary of the town of Essex; then easterly along the town line of Essex to the boundary of the town of Jericho; then southerly along the town line of Jericho to the boundary of the town of Richmond; then southwesterly along the town line of Jericho to the boundary of the town of Hinesburg; then westerly along the town line of Hinesburg to the boundary of the town of St. George; then briefly northwesterly along the town line of St. George to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-3 Jericho and Underhill 2 Chittenden-4 That portion of the town of Hinesburg not included in Chittenden-5 1 Chittenden-5 Charlotte and that portion of the town of Hinesburg encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of the town of Hinesburg intersects with Burritt Road; then northeasterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Burritt Road to the intersection of Baldwin Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Baldwin Road to the boundary of the town of Monkton; then westerly along the town line of Monkton to the boundary of the town of Charlotte; then northerly along the town line of Charlotte to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-6 That portion of the town of Shelburne encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the boundary line of Shelburne and the town of Charlotte intersects with the shore of Lake Champlain; then northerly along the shore of Lake Champlain to the mouth of Munroe Brook, including all of the lake that is part of the town of Shelburne; then upstream along the western side of the centerline of Munroe Brook to the intersection with Spear Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Spear Street to the boundary of Charlotte; then westerly along the Charlotte town line to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-7 St. George and that portion of the town of Shelburne not included in CHITTENDEN-6 1 Chittenden-8 That portion of the town of Williston not included in CHITTENDEN-2 and that portion of the city of South Burlington not included in CHITTENDEN-9, Chittenden-10, chittenden-11, or Chittenden-12 1 Chittenden-9 That portion of the city of South Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the city of South Burlington intersects with U.S. Route 2; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 2 to the intersection of Hinesburg Road; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Hinesburg Road to the intersection of Kennedy Drive; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Kennedy Drive to the intersection of Dorset Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Dorset Street to the intersection of Park Road; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Park Road to where it intersects with Tributary 7 of the Potash Brook before Golf Course Road; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of Tributary 7 of the Potash Brook to where it connects to a second branch of Tributary 7 of the Potash Brook east of the Wheeler Park Trail Head at the southeast corner of Brand Farm Drive; then southeasterly along the northwestern side of the second branch of Tributary 7 of the Potash Brook to where it intersects with Moss Glen Lane; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Moss Glen Lane to the intersection of Mill Pond Lane; the northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of Mill Pond Lane to the intersection of Oak Creek Drive; then southerly along the eastern side of Oak Creek Drive to the intersection of Butler Drive; then easterly along the northern side of Butler Drive to the intersection of Hinesburg Road; then northerly along the western side of Hinesburg Road to where it intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then easterly along the northern side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to the boundary of the town of Williston; then northerly along the town line of Williston to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-10 That portion of the city of South Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the city of South Burlington intersects with Williston Road; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Williston Road to the intersection of Hinesburg Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Hinesburg Road to the intersection of Kennedy Drive; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Kennedy Drive to the intersection of Dorset Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Dorset Street to the intersection of Williston Road; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Williston Road to the boundary of the city of Burlington; then northeasterly along the city line of Burlington to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then northeasterly along the city line of Winooski to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then easterly along the town line of Colchester to the boundary of the town of Essex; then easterly along the town line of Essex to the boundary of the town of Williston; then southerly along the town line of Williston to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-11 That portion of the city of South Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the city of South Burlington intersects with Williston Road; then southeasterly along the southern side of the centerline of Williston Road to the intersection of Dorset Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Dorset Street to the intersection of Swift Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Swift Street to the boundary of the city of Burlington at U.S. Route 7; then northerly along the city line of Burlington, then follow the city line of Burlington to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-12 That portion of the city of South Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of the city of South Burlington intersects with Swift Street at the intersection of Swift Street and U.S. Route 7; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Swift Street to the intersection of Dorset Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Dorset Street to the intersection of Nowland Farm Road; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Nowland Farm Road to the intersection of Spear Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Spear Street to the intersection of Allen Road; then westerly along the northern side of Allen Road to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then briefly southerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the boundary of the town of Shelburne; then westerly along the town line of Shelburne to where it intersects with Shelburne Bay; then northerly along the eastern side of the town line of Shelburne as it runs along Shelburne Bay; then westerly along the town line of Shelburne across Lake Champlain to the state border of New York; then northerly along the state border of New York to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then easterly along the town line of Colchester to the boundary of the city of Burlington; then southerly along the city line of Burlington, then follow the city line of Burlington to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-13 That portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the city of Burlington intersects with South Burlington Recreation Path; then westerly along the southern side of the boundary between the South Burlington Recreation Path and the Burlington Country Club to where the South Burlington Recreation Path turns north; then continuing westerly along the southern side of the property line of the Burlington Country Club to the property boundary line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 South Prospect Street; then westerly along the southern side of the property line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 Prospect Street to where it intersects with South Prospect Street; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of South Prospect Street to the intersection of Cliff Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Cliff Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then briefly northerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Spruce Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Spruce Street to the intersection of South Union Street; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of South Union Street to the intersection of Adams Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Adams Street to the intersection of South Winooski Avenue; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of South Winooski Avenue to the intersection of Maple Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Maple Street to the end of Maple Street; then continue in a line due west to the boundary of the city of South Burlington in Lake Champlain; then southeasterly along the city line of South Burlington, then follow the city line of South Burlington to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-14 That portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the city of Burlington intersects with the South Burlington Recreation Path; then westerly along the northern side of the boundary between the South Burlington Recreation Path and the Burlington Country Club to where the South Burlington Recreation Path turns north; then continuing westerly along the northern side of the property boundary of the Burlington Country Club to the property boundary line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 South Prospect Street; then westerly along the northern side of the property line between 544 South Prospect Street and 500 Prospect Street to where it intersects with South Prospect Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Prospect Street to the intersection of Cliff Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Cliff Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then briefly northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Spruce Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Spruce Street to the intersection of South Union Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Union Street to the intersection of Adams Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Adams Street to the intersection of South Winooski Avenue; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Winooski Avenue to the intersection of Buel Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Buel Street to the intersection of South Union Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Union Street to the intersection of Pearl Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Pearl Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of College Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of College Street to the intersection of South Prospect Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of South Prospect Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 2; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the westbound lane of U.S. Route 2 to the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then southerly along the city line of South Burlington to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-15 That portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the city of Burlington intersects with the railroad tracks crossing the Winooski River; then westerly along the southern side of the railroad tracks to where they intersect with a point representing the end of a straight line extension from the centerline of Hyde Street to the railroad tracks; then southwesterly along the eastern side of the straight line extension from the centerline of Hyde Street to the intersection of Hyde Street and Riverside Avenue; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Hyde Street to the intersection of North Willard Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Willard Street to the intersection of North Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of North Street to the intersection of North Winooski Avenue; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Winooski Avenue to the intersection of Pearl Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Pearl Street to the intersection of South Willard Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Willard Street to the intersection of College Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of College Street to the intersection of South Prospect Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of South Prospect Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 2; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the westbound lane of U.S. Route 2 to the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then southeasterly along the city line of South Burlington and then follow the city line of South Burlington to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then northwesterly along the city line of Winooski to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-16 That portion of the city of Burlington not included in Chittenden-13, chittenden-14, Chittenden-15, chittenden-17, and Chittenden-18 2 Chittenden-17 That portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the city of Burlington intersects with the railroad tracks crossing the Winooski River; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of the railroad tracks to where it intersects with a point representing the end of a straight line extension from the end of the centerline of Spring Street; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the straight line extension from the end of Spring Street to the intersection of Manhattan Drive and Spring Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Manhattan Drive to the intersection of Park Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Park Street to the intersection of College Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of College Street to the end of College Street; then westerly on the northern side of a line drawn from the end point of College Street due west to the boundary of the city of South Burlington in Lake Champlain; then northerly along the city line of South Burlington to where it intersects with Appletree Point; then northeasterly then southeasterly along the southeastern side of the shore of Lake Champlain to where the northwestern property line of Leddy Park intersects with the shore of Lake Champlain; then northeasterly along the southern side of that property line and continuing from that property line in a straight line to the intersection of North Avenue; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of North Avenue to the southern boundary of Farrington’s Trailer Park; then northeasterly and then northwesterly along the boundary of Farrington’s Trailer Park and the back property lines of property fronting Lopes Avenue to the northwest corner of the corner lot at the intersection of Lopes Avenue and Roseade Parkway, including all the residences on Lopes Avenue and Blondin Circle; then northeasterly along the back property lines between property fronting on Roseade Parkway and Arlington Court, including all the residences on Roseade Parkway; then turning northwesterly along the back property lines of property fronting Arlington Court to the intersection of the back property lines of property fronting Farrington Parkway on the southern side; then easterly along those back property lines to Farrington Parkway; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Farrington Parkway to the intersection of Ethan Allen Parkway, including all units at 282 Ethan Allen Parkway; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Ethan Allen Parkway to the intersection of VT Route 127; then northwesterly along the northern side of the centerline of VT Route 127 to the intersection of the boundary of the town of Colchester at the Heineberg Bridge over the Winooski River; then northerly and easterly along the town line of Colchester and then follow the town line of Colchester southerly to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then southerly along the city line of Winooski to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-18 That portion of the city of Burlington encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northwestern property line of Leddy Park intersects with the shore of Lake Champlain; then northeasterly along the northern side of that property line and continuing from that property line in a straight line to the intersection of North Avenue; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of North Avenue to the southern boundary of Farrington’s Trailer Park; then northeasterly and then northwesterly along the boundary of Farrington’s Trailer Park and the back property lines of property fronting Lopes Avenue to the northwest corner of the corner lot at the intersection of Lopes Avenue and Roseade Parkway, including all of the residences in Farrington’s Trailer Park and on Poirier Place; then northeasterly along the back property lines between property fronting on Roseade Parkway and Arlington Court, including all the residences on Arlington Court; then turning northwesterly along the back property lines of property fronting Arlington Court to the intersection of the back property lines of property fronting Farrington Parkway on the southern side; then easterly along those back property lines to Farrington Parkway; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Farrington Parkway to the intersection of Ethan Allen Parkway; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of Ethan Allen Parkway to the intersection of VT Route 127; then northwesterly along the southern side of the centerline of VT Route 127 to the intersection of the boundary of the town of Colchester at the Heineberg Bridge over the Winooski River; then northerly and westerly along the Colchester town line to the intersection with Lake Champlain; then southerly along the shore of Lake Champlain to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-19 That portion of the town of Colchester encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the town of Colchester intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then northerly along the eastern side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to where it intersects with Sunderland Brook; then easterly along the northern side of Sunderland Brook to where it intersects with U.S. Route 7; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Blakely Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Blakely Road to where it intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then northerly along the western side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to where it intersects with the Malletts Creek; then following Malletts Creek westerly out to its mouth joining Malletts Bay; then westerly on the south side of a line drawn across Malletts Bay from Interstate 89 to the boundary of the town of South Hero; than southwesterly along the town line of South Hero to the boundary of the state of New York; then southerly along border of the state of New York to the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then easterly along the city line of South Burlington to the boundary of the city of Burlington; then southeasterly along the city line of Burlington to the boundary of the city of Winooski; then easterly along the city line of Winooski to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-20 That portion of the town of Colchester not included in Chittenden-19 2 Chittenden-21 Winooski 2 Chittenden-22 That portion of Essex encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the town of Essex intersects with the property boundary between 18 River Road and 30 River Road; then northerly along the western side of the property boundary between 18 River Road and 30 River Road to the intersection of River Road; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of River Road to 3 River Road; then turning northeasterly along the western side of the property line of 3 River Road to the southwestern corner of the property boundary of 56 Forest Road; then northeasterly along the western side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Forest Road; then turning west- northwesterly along the western side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Forest Road to the intersection of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Sidney Drive; then northwesterly along the western side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Sidney Drive to the intersection of the back property lines of the properties fronting the east and north sides of Chestnut Lane; then turning northwesterly along the southwestern side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the east and north sides of Chestnut Lane, the north side of Beech Street, then the north and west sides of Spruce Lane to the intersection of the southern property boundary line of 39 Essex Way; then northwesterly along the southern side of the property line of 39 Essex Way to where it intersects with the Indian Brook; then southerly along the eastern side of the Indian Brook to where it intersects with Hubbells Falls Drive; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Hubbells Falls Drive to the intersection of Juniper Ridge Road; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Juniper Ridge Road to the intersection of Fairview Drive; then southerly following along the southeastern and then southwestern side of the centerline of Fairview Drive to the intersection of Hawthorne Circle; then westerly and northerly along the western and northern side of the centerline of Hawthorne Circle to the intersection of Fairview Drive; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Fairview Drive to the intersection of Main Street; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Main Street to the intersection of Crestview Road; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Crestview Road to the intersection of Drury Drive; then northeasterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Drury Drive to the intersection of Meadow Terrace; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Meadow Terrace to the intersection of Upland Road; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Upland Road to the intersection of Drury Drive; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Drury Drive to the intersection of Educational Drive; then northwesterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Educational Drive to the intersection of Old Colchester Road and Grove Street; then southerly along the eastern side of Grove Street to the intersection of North Street; then briefly westerly along the southern side of the centerline of North Street to the intersection of Lincoln Street; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of Lincoln Street and continuing on the western side of Lincoln Street when it turns into Colchester Road to where Colchester Road intersects with the property boundary line between 78 Lincoln Street and 98 Colchester Road; then southwesterly along the southeasterly side of the property boundary line between 78 Lincoln Street and 98 Colchester Road to where it intersects with the Indian Brook; then westerly along the southern side of the back property lines of those properties fronting the south side of Pinecrest Drive to the intersection of the back property lines of the properties fronting the end of Hampshire Court; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the end of Hampshire Court and fronting the east side of Dartmoor Court; then turning northwesterly along the southern side of the back property lines of property fronting the northeast side of Edgewood Drive to the intersection of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Warner Avenue; then turning southwesterly along the southeastern side of the back property lines of the properties fronting the west side of Warner Avenue to the end of the Sunderland Brook; then turning southeasterly along the northeastern side of the property boundary between 2 Warner Avenue and 4 Warner Avenue to the intersection of Warner Avenue; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of Warner Avenue to the intersection of Pearl Street; then northwesterly along the southern side of the centerline of Pearl Street to where it intersects with the powerlines running perpendicular to Pearl Street between 235 Pearl Street and 241 Pearl Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the powerlines to where they intersect with the boundary of the city of South Burlington; then southeasterly along the city line of South Burlington to the boundary of the town of Williston; then easterly along the town line of Williston to the point of beginning 2 Chittenden-23 That portion of the town of Essex not included in Chittenden-22 or chittenden-24 2 Chittenden-24 That portion of the town of Essex encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of the town of Essex intersects with VT Route 2A; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of VT Route 2A to the intersection of Gentes Road; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Gentes Road to where it intersects with the railroad tracks before Lamore Road; then southerly along the eastern side of the railroad tracks to where they intersect with VT Route 289; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of VT Route 289 to the intersection of Upper Main Street; then northeasterly along the northwesterly side of the centerline of Upper Main Street to the intersection of Center Road; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Center Road to the intersection of Jericho Road; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the centerline of Jericho Road to the intersection of Allen Martin Drive; then southwesterly along the southeasterly side of the centerline of Allen Martin Road to the intersection of Sandhill Road; then southerly along the eastern side of Sandhill Road to the intersection of River Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of River Road to where it intersects with Alder Brook; then southerly along the eastern side of Alder Brook to the boundary of the town of Williston; then easterly along the town line of Williston to the boundary of the town of Jericho; then northeasterly along the town line of Jericho to the boundary of the town of Westford; then westerly along the town line of Westford to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then southerly along the town line of Colchester to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden-25 Westford and that portion of the town of Milton encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the town of Milton intersects with Middle Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Middle Road to the intersection of Hobbs Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Hobbs Road to the intersection of McMullen Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of McMullen Road to the intersection of Kingsbury Crossing; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Kingsbury Crossing to where it intersects with the railroad tracks; then northerly along the eastern side of the railroad tracks to where they intersect Railroad Street; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Railroad Street to the intersection of Main Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Main Street to the intersection of North Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Road to where it intersects with the railroad tracks at the intersection of Cooper Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the railroad tracks to where they intersect with the boundary of the town of Georgia; then southeasterly along the town line of Georgia to the boundary of the town of Westford; then southwesterly along the town line of Westford to the boundary of the town of Colchester; then westerly along the town line of Colchester to the point of beginning 1 Chittenden- Franklin That portion of the town of Milton not included in Chittenden-25 or grand isle-chittenden and that portion of the town of Georgia encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the town of Georgia intersects with the northbound lane of Interstate 89; then northerly along the eastern side of the northbound lane of Interstate 89 to where it intersects with U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Highbridge Road; then southeasterly along the southern side of the centerline of Highbridge Road to Arrow Head Lake Road; then southerly and westerly along the western side of Arrow Head Lake Road to the intersection of Georgia Mountain Road; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Georgia Mountain Road to where it intersects with the railroad tracks on the southern bank of the Lamoille River; then southerly along the western side of the railroad tracks to the boundary of the town of Milton; then northeasterly along the town line of Milton to the point of beginning 2 Essex- Caledonia Bloomfield, Brunswick, Burke, East Haven, Ferdinand, Granby, Guildhall, Lunenburg, Maidstone, and Victory 1 Essex- Orleans Averill, Avery’s Gore, Brighton, Canaan, Charleston, Holland, Lemington, Lewis, Morgan, Norton, Warner’s Grant, and Warren’s Gore 1 Franklin-1 Fairfax and that portion of the town of Georgia not Included in chittenden-franklin 2 Franklin-2 That portion of the Town of St. Albans encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southern boundary line of the Town of St. Albans intersects with U.S. Route 7; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the boundary of the City of St. Albans; then northwesterly along the town line of the City of St. Albans to the intersection of Congress Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Congress Street to the intersection of VT Route 104; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of VT Route 104 to where it intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then southerly along the eastern side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to the boundary of the town of Fairfield; then northeasterly along the town line of Fairfield to the boundary of the town of Swanton; then northwesterly along the town line of Swanton to the boundary of the town of North Hero; then southerly along the town line of North Hero to the boundary of the town of Grand Isle; then southerly along the town line of Grand Isle to the boundary of the town of Georgia; then northeasterly along the town line of Georgia to the point of beginning 1 Franklin-3 That portion of the City of St. Albans encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the southwestern boundary line of the City of St. Albans intersects with the property boundary line between 2 Bowles Lane and 28 Guyette Circle; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the property boundary line between 2 Bowles Lane and 28 Guyette Circle to the intersection of Bowles Lane, Guyette Circle, and Edward Street; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of Edward Street to the intersection of Lake Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Lake Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Diamond Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Diamond Street to the intersection of Lincoln Avenue; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of Lincoln Avenue to the intersection of Fairfield Street; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of Fairfield Street to the boundary line of the Town of St. Albans; then northerly along the town line of the Town of St. Albans, then follow the town line to the point of beginning 1 Franklin-4 Sheldon and Swanton 2 Franklin-5 Berkshire, Franklin, Highgate, and Richford 2 Franklin-6 Bakersfield, Fairfield, and Fletcher 1 Franklin-7 Enosburgh and Montgomery 1 Franklin-8 That portion of the City of St. Albans not included in FRANKLIN-3 and that portion of the Town of St. Albans not included in FRANKLIN-2 1 Grand isle- Chittenden Alburgh, Grand Isle, Isle La Motte, North Hero, South Hero, and that portion of the town of Milton encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the town of Milton intersects with the southbound lane of Interstate 89; then southerly along the western side of the southbound lane of Interstate 89 to where it intersects with the Lamoille River; then southeasterly along the northwestern side of the Lamoille River to where it intersects with the boundary of the town of Colchester; then westerly along the town line of Colchester to the boundary of the town of South Hero; then northerly along the town line of South Hero to the boundary of the town of Grand Isle; then northerly along the town line of Grand Isle to the boundary of the town of Georgia; then southeasterly along the town line of Georgia to the point of beginning 2 Lamoille-1 That portion of the town of Stowe encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northeastern boundary line of the town of Stowe intersects with Moulton Lane; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of Moulton Lane to where it intersects with the Sterling Brook; then southerly along the western side of Sterling Brook to the point it becomes the Waterbury River; then southerly along the western side of the Waterbury River to where it intersects with West Hill Road; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the centerline of West Hill Road to the intersection of VT Route 100; then briefly northeasterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of VT Route 100 to the intersection of Brush Hill Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Brush Hill Road to the intersection of Brownsville Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Brownsville Road to the intersection of Moss Glen Falls Road; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Moss Glen Falls Road to the intersection of Randolph Road; then briefly easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Randolph Road to the intersection of Elmore Mountain Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Elmore Mountain Road to the boundary of the town of Morristown; then easterly along the town line of Morristown to the boundary of the town of Worcester; then southwesterly along the town line of Worcester to the boundary of the town of Waterbury; then westerly along the town line of Waterbury to the boundary of the town of Bolton; then westerly along the town line of Bolton to the boundary of the town of Underhill; then northerly along the town line of Underhill to the boundary of the town of Cambridge; then northerly along the town line of Cambridge to the boundary of the town of Morristown; then southeasterly along the town line of Morristown to the point of beginning 1 Lamoille-2 Belvidere, Hyde Park, Johnson, and Wolcott 2 Lamoille-3 Cambridge and Waterville 1 Lamoille- Washington Elmore, Morristown, Woodbury, Worcester, and that portion of Stowe not included in LAMOILLE-1 2 Orange-1 Corinth, Orange, Vershire, and Washington 1 Orange-2 Bradford, Fairlee, and West Fairlee 1 Orange-3 Chelsea and that portion of the town of Williamstown encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of the town of Williamstown intersects with McGlynn Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of McGlynn Road to the intersection of Graniteville Road; then briefly westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Graniteville Road to the intersection of Martin Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Martin Road to the intersection of Therriault Hill Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Therriault Hill Road to the intersection of Sugarhouse Road; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Sugarhouse Road to the boundary of the town of Washington; then southerly along the town line of Washington to the boundary of the town of Chelsea; then westerly along the town line of Chelsea to the boundary of the town of Brookfield; then westerly along the town line of Brookfield to boundary of the town of Northfield; then northerly along the town line of Northfield to the boundary of the town of Berlin; then easterly and northerly along the town line of Berlin to the boundary of the Town of Barre; then easterly along the town line of Barre to the point of beginning 1 Orange- Caledonia Groton, Newbury, and Topsham 1 Orange- Washington- Addison Braintree, Brookfield, Granville, Randolph, and Roxbury 2 Orleans-1 Derby 1 Orleans-2 Newport City 1 Orleans-3 Barton, Brownington, and Westmore 1 Orleans-4 Albany, Craftsbury, Glover, and Greensboro 1 Orleans- Lamoille Coventry, Eden, Irasburg, Jay, Lowell, Newport Town, Troy, and Westfield 2 Rutland-1 Ira, Poultney, and that portion of the town of Wells not In rutland-bennington 1 Rutland-2 Clarendon, Wallingford, West Rutland, and that portion of Rutland Town not included in Rutland-4 2 Rutland-3 Castleton 1 Rutland-4 That portion of Rutland City not included in Rutland-5, rutland-6, or rutland-7, and that portion of Rutland Town encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of Rutland Town intersects with North Grove Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of North Grove Street to the boundary of Rutland City; then easterly along the northern side of the city line of Rutland City to the intersection of U.S. Route 4; then northeasterly along the northwestern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 4 to the boundary of the town of Mendon; then northerly along the town line of Mendon to the boundary of the town of Pittsford; then westerly along the town line of Pittsford to the point of beginning 1 Rutland-5 That portion of Rutland City encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northeastern boundary line of Rutland City intersects with U.S. Route 4; then southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 4 to the intersection of East Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of East Street to the intersection of Jackson Avenue; then briefly westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Jackson Avenue to intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Allen Street; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Allen Street to where it intersects with the railroad tracks; then southeasterly along the northeastern side of the railroad tracks to where the railroad tracks intersect with the boundary of Rutland Town; then easterly along the town line of Rutland Town, then follow the town line of Rutland Town to the point of beginning 1 Rutland-6 That portion of Rutland City encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of Rutland City intersects with West Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of West Street to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then northerly along the eastern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to intersection of U.S. Route 4; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of U.S. Route 4 to the intersection of East Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of East Street to the intersection of Jackson Avenue; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Jackson Avenue to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the intersection of Allen Street; then briefly easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Allen Street to where it intersects with the railroad tracks; then southeasterly along the southwestern side of the railroad tracks to where the railroad tracks intersect with the boundary of Rutland Town; then westerly along the town line of Rutland Town; then follow the town line of Rutland Town to the point of beginning 1 Rutland-7 That portion of Rutland City encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the western boundary line of Rutland City intersects with West Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of West Street to the intersection of Church Street; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of Church Street to intersection of North Street; then briefly easterly along the northern side of the centerline of North Street to the intersection of Lincoln Avenue; then briefly southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Lincoln Avenue to the intersection of Melrose Avenue; then easterly along the north side of the centerline of Melrose Avenue to the intersection of U.S. Route 7; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of U.S. Route 7 to the boundary of Rutland Town; then westerly along the town line of Rutland Town; then follow the town line of Rutland Town to the point of beginning 1 Rutland-8 Pittsford and Proctor 1 Rutland-9 Brandon 1 Rutland-10 Benson, Fair Haven, and West Haven 1 Rutland-11 Chittenden, Killington, Mendon, and Pittsfield 1 Rutland- Bennington Middletown Springs, Pawlet, Rupert, Tinmouth, and that portion of the town of Wells encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of Wells intersects with VT Route 30; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of VT Route 30 to the intersection of VT Route 30 and Main Street; then continuing southwesterly along the southeastern side of the centerline of VT Route 30 to the boundary of Pawlet; then easterly along the town line of Pawlet to the boundary of the town of Tinmouth; then northerly along the town line of Tinmouth to the boundary of the town of Middletown Springs; then northeasterly along the town line of Middletown Springs to the boundary of the town of Poultney, then westerly along the town line of Poultney to the point of beginning 1 Rutland- Windsor Ludlow, Mount Holly, and Shrewsbury 1 Washington-1 Berlin and Northfield 2 Washington-2 Duxbury, Fayston, Moretown, Waitsfield, and Warren 2 Washington-3 Barre City 2 Washington-4 Montpelier 2 Washington-5 East Montpelier and Middlesex 1 Washington-6 Calais, Marshfield, and Plainfield 1 Washington- Chittenden Bolton, Buels Gore, Huntington, and Waterbury 2 Washington- Orange Barre Town and that portion of the town of Williamstown not included in ORANGE-3 2 Windham-1 Guilford and Vernon 1 Windham-2 Dover, Jamaica, Somerset, Stratton, and Wardsboro 1 Windham-3 Brookline, Rockingham, and Westminster 2 Windham-4 Dummerston and Putney 1 Windham-5 Marlboro, Newfane, and Townshend 1 Windham-6 Halifax, Wilmington, and Whitingham 1 Windham-7 That portion of the town of Brattleboro encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the boundary line between the town of Brattleboro and the town of Dummerston intersects with Wickopee Hill Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Wickopee Hill Road and then continuing southerly along the western side of the centerline of Pleasant Valley Road to the intersection of Meadowbrook Road; then northeasterly along the southern side of the centerline of Meadowbrook Road to the intersection of Upper Dummerston Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Upper Dummerston Road to the intersection of East Orchard Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of East Orchard Street to the intersection of Orchard Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Orchard Street to the intersection of Western Avenue; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Western Avenue to the intersection of Guilford Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Guilford Street to the intersection of Maple Street; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of Maple Street to where it intersects with tax map parcel 00110367.000; then southerly along the western side of the western boundary of tax map parcels 00110367.000 and 00110368.000; then westerly along the northern side of the southern boundary of tax parcel 00110369.000 to tax map parcel 00110378.000; then north easterly along the eastern side of the easterly boundary of tax parcel 0110378.000 following the parcel boundary to Guilford Street; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Guilford Street to the boundary of the town of Guilford; then westerly along the town line of Guilford to the boundary of the town of Marlboro; then northerly along the town line of Marlboro to the boundary of the town of Dummerston; then easterly along the town line of Dummerston to the point of beginning 1 Tax parcel ID numbers in WINDHAM-7 are those numbers recorded in the town clerk’s office as of April 1, 2020. Windham-8 That portion of the town of Brattleboro encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the eastern boundary line of the town of Brattleboro along the Connecticut River intersects with the Whetstone Brook; then westerly along the southern side of the Whetstone Brook to the intersection with Elm Street; then northerly along the western side of the centerline of Elm Street to the intersection of Frost Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Frost Street to the intersection of Williams Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Williams Street to the intersection of Brannan Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Brannan Street to the intersection of West Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of West Street to the intersection of Strand Avenue; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of West Street to the intersection of Williams Street; then westerly along the southern side of the centerline of Williams Street past Whetstone Drive to where it intersects with the Whetstone Brook; then westerly along the southern side the centerline of the Whetstone Brook past Interstate 91 to the intersection of Guilford Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Guilford Street to the intersection of Maple Street; then easterly along the northern side of the centerline of Maple Street to the westerly boundary of tax parcel 00110367.000; then southerly along the eastern side of the western boundary of tax parcels 00110367.000 and 00110368.000; then westerly along the south side of the southern boundary of tax parcel 00110369.000 to tax parcel 00110378.000; then northeasterly along the western side of the eastern boundary of tax parcel 00110378.000 following the parcel boundary to Guilford Street; then southerly along the eastern side of the centerline of Guilford Street to the boundary of the town of Guilford; then easterly along the town line of Guilford to the intersection with the Connecticut River; then northerly along the Connecticut River to the point of beginning. 1 Tax parcel ID numbers in WINDHAM-8 are those numbers recorded in the town clerk’s office as of April 1, 2020. Windham-9 That portion of the town of Brattleboro not located in Windham-7 or windham-8 1 Windham- Windsor- Bennington Andover, Londonderry, Weston, and Winhall 1 Windsor-1 Hartland, West Windsor, and Windsor 2 Windsor-2 Baltimore, Cavendish, and Weathersfield 1 Windsor-3 Springfield 2 Windsor-4 Barnard, Bridgewater, Pomfret, and that portion of the town of Hartford encompassed within a boundary beginning at the point where the northern boundary line of Hartford and Norwich intersects with Joshua Road; then southerly along the western side of the centerline of Joshua Road to the intersection of Jericho Street; then southwesterly along the northern side of the centerline of Jericho Street to the intersection of VT Route 14; then easterly along the southern side of the centerline of VT Route 14 to the intersection of the centerline of Runnals Road and VT Route 14; then turn south along the southwesterly side of a straight line extension from the end of Runnals Road across the White River to the intersection of Old River Road and the beginning of Costello Road; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Costello Road to the intersection of Old Quechee Road; then southwesterly along the northeasterly side of the centerline of Old Quechee Road to the intersection of Quechee Main Street; then westerly along the northern side of the centerline of Quechee Main Street to the intersection of Waterman Hill Road and the Quechee Covered Bridge; then westerly along the northern side of the Ottauquechee River to the boundary line of the town of Hartland; then westerly along the town line of Hartland to the boundary of the town of Woodstock; then westerly along the town line of Woodstock to the boundary of the town of Pomfret; then northerly along the town line of Pomfret along the town line of Sharon to the boundary of the town of Norwich; then easterly along the town line of Norwich to the point of beginning 1 Windsor-5 Plymouth, Reading, and Woodstock 1 Windsor-6 That portion of the town of Hartford not located in Windsor-4 2 Windsor- Addison Bethel, Hancock, Rochester, and Stockbridge 1 Windsor- Orange-1 Royalton and Tunbridge 1 Windsor- Orange-2 Norwich, Sharon, Strafford, and Thetford 2 Windsor- Windham Athens, Chester, Grafton, and Windham 1